District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1011.02

Targeted Program areas.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2172, 57 DCR 181
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9017(d), 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2172 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2172 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9017(d) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9017(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9017(d) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Editor's Notes

Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9017(d) of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.